Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 32. Dental Hygienists and Assistants.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to needle stick and sharps injury protections, see AS

18.60.880

—

18.60.890

.

Collateral references. —

Constitutionality, construction and application of statutes relating to dental hygienists, 11 ALR2d 724.